Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.114

Disclosure statement required—Prerequisite to lien claim.

(1) Any contractor agreeing to perform any contracting project: (a) For the repair, alteration, or construction of four or fewer residential units or accessory structures on such residential property when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial building when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more but less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer with the following disclosure statement in substantially the following form using lower case and upper case twelve-point and bold type where appropriate, prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is registered with the state of Washington, registration no. . . ., and has posted with the state a bond or deposit of . . . . . for the purpose of satisfying claims against the contractor for breach of contract including negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of this contractor's registration is . . . . ..

THIS BOND OR DEPOSIT MIGHT NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM THAT MIGHT ARISE FROM THE WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This bond or deposit is not for your exclusive use because it covers all work performed by this contractor. The bond or deposit is intended to pay valid claims up to . . . . . that you and other customers, suppliers, subcontractors, or taxing authorities may have.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY WITHHOLD A PERCENTAGE OF YOUR CONTRACT.

You may withhold a contractually defined percentage of your construction contract as retainage for a stated period of time to provide protection to you and help insure that your project will be completed as required by your contract.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If a supplier of materials used in your construction project or an employee or subcontractor of your contractor or subcontractors is not paid, your property may be liened to force payment and you could pay twice for the same work.

FOR ADDITIONAL PROTECTION, YOU MAY REQUEST THE CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE YOU WITH ORIGINAL "LIEN RELEASE" DOCUMENTS FROM EACH SUPPLIER OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON YOUR PROJECT.

The contractor is required to provide you with further information about lien release documents if you request it. General information is also available from the state Department of Labor and Industries.

I have received a copy of this disclosure statement.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Signature of customer)"

(2) The contractor must retain a signed copy of the disclosure statement in his or her files for a minimum of three years, and produce a copy of the signed disclosure statement to the department upon request.

(3) A contractor subject to this section shall notify any consumer to whom notice is required under subsection (1) of this section if the contractor's registration has expired or is revoked or suspended by the department prior to completion or other termination of the contract with the consumer.

(4) No contractor subject to this section may bring or maintain any lien claim under chapter 60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section applies without alleging and proving that the contractor has provided the customer with a copy of the disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) of this section.

(5) This section does not apply to contracts authorized under chapter 39.04 RCW or to contractors contracting with other contractors.

(6) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute an infraction under the provisions of this chapter.

(7) The department shall produce model disclosure statements, and public service announcements detailing the information needed to assist contractors and contractors' customers to comply under this section. As necessary, the department shall periodically update these education materials.

[ 2020 c 57 s 26; 2007 c 436 s 8; 2001 c 159 s 9; 1997 c 314 s 12; 1988 c 182 s 1; 1987 c 419 s 1.]

NOTES:

Voluntary compliance with notification requirements: "Nothing in RCW 18.27.114 shall be construed to prohibit a contractor from voluntarily complying with the notification requirements of that section which take effect July 1, 1989, prior to that date." [ 1988 c 182 s 2.]